th: คุณลักษณะของนาฬิกาสมาร์ทวอช: สัญญาณเตือน; ป้องกันแสงสะท้อน; การตรวจสอบระดับออกซิเจนในเลือด; การตรวจสอบความดันโลหิต; การควบคุมกล้อง; เข็มทิศ; หน้าปัดนาฬิกาที่ปรับแต่งได้; ฟีเจอร์ตำแหน่งที่ตั้งของอุปกรณ์; การตรวจสอบคลื่น ECG; เครื่องติดตามกิจกรรมออกกำลังกาย; รองรับ GPS; เครื่องวัดอัตราการเต้นของหัวใจ; เปลี่ยนสายได้; การควบดนตรี; พื้นที่จัดเก็บเพลงออฟไลน์; เครื่องมือติดตามการนอนหลับ; เครื่องนับก้าว; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; แบบทัชสกรีน; การสั่นสะเทือน; การควบคุมเสียง; กันน้ำ; นาฬิกาเทียบเวลาทั่วโลก; อื่นๆ
cs: Vlastnosti chytrých hodinek: Alarm; Antireflexní; Monitorování hladiny kyslíku v krvi; Monitorování krevního tlaku; Ovládání kamery; Kompas; Přizpůsobitelné ciferníky; Funkce umístění zařízení; Monitorování EKG; Fitness tracker; Podpora GPS; Monitor srdečního tepu; Vyměnitelný řemínek; Ovládání hudby; Ukládání hudby offline; Sledování spánku; Počítadlo kroků; Teploměr; Dotyková obrazovka; Vibrace; Hlasové ovládání; Voděodolný; Světový čas; Jiné
bg-BG: Функции на смарт часовник: Аларма; Антирефлексен; Мониторинг на нивото на кислород в кръвта; Мониторинг на кръвното налягане; Управление на камерата; Компас; Персонализируеми циферблати; Функция за местоположение на устройството; ЕКГ мониторинг; Фитнес тракер; Поддръжка на GPS; Монитор на пулса; Сменяема каишка; Управление на музиката; Съхраняване на музика офлайн; Следене на съня; Брояч на крачки; Термометър; Сензорен екран; Вибрации; Гласово управление; Водоустойчив; Световен таймер; Други
sl-SI: Funkcije pametne ure: Alarm; Protiodsevna; Spremljanje ravni kisika v krvi; Spremljanje krvnega tlaka; Nadzor kamere; Kompas; Prilagodljive številčnice ure; Funkcija lokacije naprave; spremljanje EKG; Sledilnik telesne pripravljenosti; GPS-podpora; Spremljevalec srčnega utripa; Zamenljiv pašček; Nadzor glasbe; Shranjevanje glasbe brez povezave; Sledilnik spanja; Števec korakov; Termometer; Zaslon na dotik; Vibracije; Glasovno upravljanje; Vodoodporen; Svetovni časovnik; Drugo
hr-HR: Značajke pametnog sata: Alarm; Nereflektirajuće; Praćenje razine kisika u krvi; Praćenje krvnog tlaka; Upravljanje kamerom; Kompas; Prilagodljive pozadine sata; Značajka lokacije uređaja; EKG praćenje; Praćenje kondicije; Podrška za GPS; Praćenje otkucaja srca; Zamjenjivi remen; Upravljanje glazbom; Izvanmrežna pohrana glazbe; Praćenje spavanja; Brojač koraka; Termometar; Zaslon osjetljiv na dodir; Vibracija; Glasovno upravljanje; Vodootporno; Svjetsko vrijeme; Ostalo
lt-LT: Išmaniojo laikrodžio funkcijos: Žadintuvas; Neatspindintis šviesos; Deguonies kiekio kraujyje stebėjimas; Kraujo spaudimo matavimas; Fotoaparato valdymas; Kompasas; Pasirenkami laikrodžio ciferblatai; Įrenginio vietos funkcija; EKG matavimas; Aktyvumo stebėjimas; GPS palaikymas; Širdies ritmo matavimas; Keičiamas dirželis; Muzikos valdymas; Muzikos saugykla neprisijungus; Miego kokybės matavimas; Žingsnių skaitiklis; Termometras; Jutiklinis ekranas; Vibravimas; Valdymas balsu; Atsparus vandeniui; Pasaulio laikmatis; Kita
pl: Funkcje smartwatcha: Alarm; Antyrefleksyjny; Monitorowanie poziomu tlenu we krwi; Kontrola ciśnienia tętniczego krwi; Sterowanie kamery; Kompas; Konfigurowalne tarcze zegarka; Funkcja lokalizacji urządzenia; Monitorowanie EKG; Śledzenie aktywności fizycznej; Obsługa GPS; Monitor pracy serca; Wymienny pasek; Sterowanie muzyką; Przechowywanie muzyki w trybie offline; Śledzenie snu; Licznik kroków; Termometr; Ekran dotykowy; Drgania; Sterowanie głosowe; Wodoszczelny; Timer czasu światowego; Pozostałe
fr: Fonctionnalités de la montre intelligente: Alarme; Anti-réfléchissant; Surveillance du niveau d’oxygène dans le sang; Tensiomètre; Contrôle de l’appareil photo; Boussole; Cadrans personnalisables; Fonction de localisation de l’appareil; Surveillance ECG; Tracker d'activité; Prise en charge du GPS; Moniteur de fréquence cardiaque; Sangle interchangeable; Contrôle de la musique; Stockage de musique hors ligne; Suivi du sommeil; Compteur de pas; Thermomètre; Écran tactile; Vibration; Commande vocale; Imperméable; Horloge mondiale; Autre
ro-RO: Caracteristicile ceasului inteligent: Alarmă; Antireflex; Monitorizarea nivelului de oxigen din sânge; Monitorizarea tensiunii arteriale; Controlul camerei; Busolă; Fețe de ceas personalizabile; Funcție de localizare a dispozitivului; Monitorizare EKG; Dispozitiv de urmărire a activității fizice; Compatibil cu GPS; Monitor ritm cardiac; Curea interschimbabilă; Controlul muzicii; Stocare offline pentru muzică; Monitor de somn; Contor de pași; Termometru; Ecran tactil; Vibrații; Control vocal; Impermeabil; Cronometru mondial; Altele
nl: Kenmerken smartwatch: Wekker; Anti-reflecterend; Bewaking van het zuurstofgehalte in het bloed; Bloeddrukmeting; Camerabediening; Kompas; Aanpasbare wijzerplaten; Functie voor apparaatlocatie; ECG-bewaking; Fitnesstracker; GPS ondersteuning; Hartslagmonitor; Verwisselbare band; Muziekbediening; Offline muziekopslag; Slaaptracker; Stappenteller; Thermometer; Touchscreen; Trillingen; Spraakbesturing; Waterdicht; Wereldklok; Andere
zh-CN: 智能手表功能: 闹钟; 防反光; 血氧水平监测; 血压监测; 相机控制; 指南针; 可定制表盘; 设备定位功能; 心电图监测; 健身追踪器; 支持 GPS; 心率监测器; 可互换表带; 音乐控制; 离线音乐存储; 睡眠追踪器; 计步器; 温度计; 触摸屏; 振动; 语音控制; 防水; 世界时间腕表; 其他
ko: 스마트워치 기능: 경보; 반사 방지; 혈중 산소 농도 모니터링; 혈압 모니터링; 카메라 제어; 나침반; 맞춤형 시계 모드; 장치 위치 기능; ECG 모니터링; 피트니스 트래커; GPS 지원; 심박 측정기; 교체 가능 스트랩; 음악 제어; 오프라인 음악 저장; 수면 추적기; 만보기; 온도계; 터치스크린; 진동; 음성 제어; 방수; 월드 타이머; 기타
de: Funktionen der Smartwatch: Alarm; Antireflex; Überwachung des Blutsauerstoffspiegels; Blutdrucküberwachung; Kamerasteuerung; Kompass; Personalisierbare Zifferblätter; Gerätestandortfeature; EKG-Monitoring; Fitnesstracker; GPS-Unterstützung; Herzfrequenzmesser; Austauschbarer Träger; Musiksteuerung; Offline-Musikspeicher; Schlaf-Tracker; Schrittzähler; Thermometer; Touchscreen; Vibration; Sprachsteuerung; Wasserdicht; Weltzeituhr; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Recursos do relógio inteligente: Alarme; Antirreflexo; Monitoramento do nível de oxigênio no sangue; Monitoramento da pressão arterial; Controle da câmera; Bússola; Mostradores de relógio customizáveis; Recurso de localização do dispositivo; Monitoramento de ECG; Monitorador de condicionamento físico; Suporte a GPS; Monitor de frequência cardíaca; Pulseira intercambiável; Controle de música; Armazenamento de música offline; Rastreador do sono; Contador de passos; Termômetro; Tela sensível ao toque; Vibração; Controle de voz; À prova d'água; Relógio mundial; Outro
zh-TW: 智慧手錶功能: 警報; 防反光; 血氧水平監測; 血壓監測; 相機控制; 指南針; 可客製化錶盤; 裝置定位功能; ECG 監測; 健身追蹤器; 支援 GPS; 心率監測儀; 可互換帶子; 音樂控制; 離線音樂儲存空間; 睡眠追蹤器; 計步器; 溫度計; 觸控螢幕; 振動; 語音控制; 防水; 世界計時器; 其他
nb: Smartklokkefunksjoner: Alarm; Antirefleks; Overvåking av oksygennivå i blodet; Blodtrykksmåling; Kamerakontroll; Kompass; Tilpassbare urskiver; Enhetsplasseringsfunksjon; ECG-overvåkning; Fitness-sporer; GPS-støtte; Pulsmåter; Utskiftbar stropp; Musikkkontroll; Frakoblet musikklagring; Søvnsporing; Skritt-teller; Termometer; Berøringsskjerm; Vibrasjon; Talekontroll; Vannsikker; Verdenstidtaker; Annen
es: Características del reloj inteligente: Alarma; Antirreflectante; Supervisión del nivel de oxígeno en sangre; Supervisión de la presión arterial; Control de cámara; Brújula; Esferas de reloj personalizables; Función de ubicación del dispositivo; Monitoreo de ECG; Rastreador de actividad física; Compatible con GPS; Monitor de ritmo cardíaco; Correa intercambiable; Control de música; Almacenamiento de música sin conexión; Rastreador de sueño; Contador de pasos; Termómetro; Pantalla táctil; Vibración; Control por voz; Impermeable; Reloj mundial; Otros
it: Funzionalità dell'orologio intelligente: Allarme; Antiriflesso; Monitoraggio del livello di ossigeno nel sangue; Monitoraggio della pressione sanguigna; Controllo della fotocamera; Bussola; Quadranti personalizzabili; Funzionalità di localizzazione del dispositivo; Monitor con ECG; Sistema di monitoraggio per attività di fitness; Supporto GPS; Rilevatori del battito cardiaco; Cinturino intercambiabile; Controllo della musica; Archiviazione di musica offline; Monitoraggio del sonno; Contapassi; Termometro; Touchscreen; Vibrazione; Controllo vocale; Impermeabile; World timer; Altro
tr: Akıllı saat özellikleri: Alarm; Yansıma önleyici; Kandaki oksijen seviyesi izleme; Kan basıncı izleme; Kamera kontrolü; Pusula; Özelleştirilebilir saat kadranları; Cihaz konumu özelliği; EKG izleme; Fitness takip cihazı; GPS desteği; Kalp atış hızı ölçüm cihazı; Değiştirilebilir kayış; Müzik kontrolü; Çevrimdışı müzik depolama; Uyku takip cihazı; Adım sayacı; Termometre; Dokunmatik ekran; Titreşim; Ses kontrolü; Su geçirmez; Dünya saati; Diğer
en: Smart watch features: Alarm; Anti-reflective; Blood oxygen level monitoring; Blood pressure monitoring; Camera control; Compass; Customizable watch faces; Device location feature; ECG monitoring; Fitness tracker; GPS support; Heart rate monitor; Interchangeable strap; Music control; Offline music storage; Sleep tracker; Step counter; Thermometer; Touchscreen; Vibration; Voice control; Waterproof; World timer; Other
ru: Функции смарт-часов: Будильник; Антибликовый; Мониторинг уровня кислорода в крови; Мониторинг артериального давления; Управление камерой; Компас; Настраиваемые циферблаты; Функция определения местоположения устройства; Мониторинг ЭКГ; Фитнес-трекер; Поддержка GPS; Монитор сердечного ритма; Сменный ремешок; Управление музыкой; Хранение музыки в автономном режиме; Трекер сна; Счетчик шагов; Термометр; Сенсорный экран; Вибрация; Голосовое управление; Водонепроницаемые; Мировое время; Другое
sk-SK: Funkcie inteligentných hodiniek: Alarm; Antireflexný; Monitorovanie hladiny kyslíka v krvi; Monitorovanie krvného tlaku; Ovládanie kamery; Kompas; Prispôsobiteľné ciferníky; Funkcia polohy zariadenia; Monitorovanie EKG; Fitness tracker; Podpora GPS; Monitor srdcovej frekvencie; Vymeniteľný popruh; Ovládanie hudby; Offline úložisko hudby; Monitor spánku; Počítadlo krokov; Teplomer; Dotykový displej; Vibrácie; Ovládanie hlasom; Vodotesný; Svetový časovač; Iné
vi: Tính năng đồng hồ thông minh: Báo thức; Chống phản chiếu; Theo dõi nồng độ oxy trong máu; Theo dõi huyết áp; Điều khiển camera; La bàn; Mặt đồng hồ có thể tùy chỉnh; Tính năng định vị thiết bị; Thiết bị theo dõi chỉ số điện tim; Theo dõi sức khỏe; Hỗ trợ GPS; Máy theo dõi nhịp tim; Dây đeo đổi lẫn được; Điều khiển nhạc; Lưu trữ nhạc ngoại tuyến; Công cụ theo dõi giấc ngủ; Bộ đếm bước; Nhiệt kế; Màn hình cảm ứng; Rung; Điều khiển bằng giọng nói; Chống thấm nước; Đồng hồ thế giới; Khác
da: Smartwatchfunktioner: Alarm; Anti-reflekterende; Overvågning af iltniveau i blodet; Blodtryksovervågning; Kamerakontrol; Kompas; Brugerdefinerbare urskiver; Enhedsplaceringsfunktion; EKG-overvågning; Fitness-tracker; GPS-support; Pulsmåler; Udskiftelig rem; Musikkontrol; Offline musiklagring; Søvntracker; Skridttæller; Termometer; Touchskærm; Vibration; Stemmekontrol; Vandtæt; Verdenstimer; Andet
fi: Älykellon ominaisuudet: Hälytys; Heijastamaton; Veren happipitoisuuden seuranta; Verenpaineen seuranta; Kameran ohjaus; Kompassi; Muokattavat kellotaulut; Laitteen sijaintiominaisuus; EKG-valvonta; Aktiivisuuden seuranta; GPS-tuettu; Sykemittari; Vaihdettava hihna; Musiikin ohjaus; Offline-musiikin tallennustila; Unenseurantalaite; Askellaskuri; Lämpömittari; Kosketusnäyttö; Värinä; Ääniohjaus; Vedenkestävä; Maailman ajastin; Muu
ja: スマートウォッチの機能: アラーム; 反射防止; 血中酸素濃度のモニタリング; 血圧モニタリング; カメラコントロール; コンパス; カスタマイズ可能なウォッチフェイス; デバイスの位置情報機能; ECGモニタリング; フィットネストラッカー; GPSサポート; 心拍数モニター; 交換可能ストラップ; ミュージックコントロール; オフライン音楽ストレージ; 睡眠トラッカー; ステップカウンター; 体温計; タッチスクリーン; 振動; 音声コントロール; 防水; 世界時計; その他
hu: Okosóra jellemzői: Riasztás; Tükröződésmentes; Véroxigénszint-figyelés; Vérnyomásfigyelés; Kameravezérlés; Iránytű; Testreszabható óralapok; Eszközhelymeghatározási funkció; EKG-figyelés; Fitneszkövető; GPS-támogatás; Pulzusfigyelő; Cserélhető szíj; Zenevezérlés; Offline zenei tárhely; Alváskövető; Lépésszámláló; Hőmérő; Érintőképernyő; Rezgés; Hangvezérlés; Vízálló; Világidőzítő; Egyéb
pt-PT: Recursos do relógio inteligente: Alarme; Antirreflexo; Monitorização do nível de oxigénio no sangue; Monitorização de pressão arterial; Controlo da câmara; Bússola; Mostradores de relógio personalizáveis; Recurso de localização do dispositivo; Monitorização de ECG; Rastreador de fitness; Suporte de GPS; Monitor de batimento cardíaco; Alça intercambiável; Controlo de música; Armazenamento de música offline; Rastreador de sono; Contador de passos; Termómetro; Ecrã tátil; Vibração; Controlo por voz; Impermeável; Temporizador mundial; Outro
el: Λειτουργίες έξυπνου ρολογιού: Τρομάζω; Αντιανακλαστική; Παρακολούθηση επιπέδων οξυγόνου στο αίμα; Πιεσόμετρα; Τύπος ελέγχου κάμερας; Πυξίδα; Προσαρμόσιμα όψεις ρολογιού; Λειτουργία τοποθεσίας συσκευής; Παρακολούθησης θέματος; Fitness tracker; Υποστήριξη GPS; Παρακολούθηση καρδιακών παλμών; Εναλλάξιμα μέρη; Έλεγχος μουσικής; Αποθήκευση μουσικής εκτός σύνδεσης; Παρακολούθηση ύπνου; Βηματόμετρο; Θερμόμετρο; Οθόνη αφής; Δόνηση; Φωνητικός έλεγχος; Αδιάβροχο; Παγκόσμιο χρονόμετρο; Άλλο
sv: Detaljer för smartwatch: Larm; Antireflex; Övervakning av syrenivån i blodet; Blodtrycksmätare; Kamerakontroll; Kompass; Anpassningsbara urtavlor; Enhetsplaceringsfunktion; EKG-monitorer; Fitnessmätare; GPS-stöd; Pulsmätare; Utbytbar rem; Musikkontroll; Musiklagring offline; Sömnspårare; Stegräknare; Termometer; Pekskärm; Vibration; Röststyrning; Vattensäker; Världstimer; Annat